Hawaii, session 2026, SB2939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State is on a path to one hundred per cent renewable energy by 2045, with significant investment in energy infrastructure including utility-scale solar and wind farms, battery storage, grid modernization, electric vehicle charging, and firm power generation plants.  However, the benefits of the State's clean energy transition have not been shared equitably, with the ability of wealthy homeowners to install rooftop solar and access tax credits and rebates while renters, apartment residents, and working families still pay some of the highest electric rates in the nation. Rural families, low-income households, and Native Hawaiian communities continue to lack access to the benefits of major energy projects that are sited near them and are disproportionately impacted by energy infrastructure. The legislature further finds that major energy projects can be approved without community input which fosters conflict, lawsuits, and delays for construction that derail the State's clean energy goals.  Addressing the inequity of electricity bills in proportion to income between working families and wealthy households must be a state priority. Therefore, major energy projects should be subjected to energy equity impact assessments and community input in order to protect working families from elevated costs and promote local economic opportunity. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the public utilities commission to hold at least two community meetings before approving a major energy project that would be hosted in the affected community. SECTION 2. Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§269-    Major energy projects; community meetings. (a)  The commission shall hold not less than two public community meetings to discuss and receive input from the community on potential major energy projects that would be hosted in the affected community. (b)  For the purposes of this section "major energy projects" means projects with a total capital cost not less than $10,000,000 or that require commission docket approval.  "Major energy projects" may include but are not limited to: (1)  Utility-scale solar photovoltaic systems; (2)  Wind energy generating facilities; (3)  Battery storage systems; (4)  Grid modernization and transmission systems; (5)  Electric vehicle charging infrastructure; (6)  Geothermal energy facilities; (7)  Firm power generating facilities; and (8)  Utility rate cases affecting residential customer rates." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________